src/morphology/affixes/rus-Cyrl-2-Lat-propernouns.lexc
!! Proper noun inflection

!! Erzya proper nouns inflect in the same cases as regular
!! nouns.

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!! Male given name for deriving patronyms 
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
! Andrʼej:Andrʼe
LEXICON PropNameMaleDer-J-0Evich
+Orth/Colloq:ič PROP_OŠ_PATRMAL ;
:jevič PROP_OŠ_PATRMAL ;
:jevna PROP_KUDO_PATRFEM ;
:%>%{ijPRC%} PROP_OSTAI_MAL ;

LEXICON PropNameMaleDer-IJ-Y0Evich
+Orth/Colloq:ʼič PROP_OŠ_PATRMAL ;
:ʼjevič PROP_OŠ_PATRMAL ;
:ʼjevna PROP_KUDO_PATRFEM ;
:ii PROP_PAGIZII_MAL ;

LEXICON PropNameMaleDer-IJ-I0Evich
+Orth/Colloq:ʼič PROP_OŠ_PATRMAL ;
:ijevič PROP_OŠ_PATRMAL ;
:ijevna PROP_KUDO_PATRFEM ;
:ii PROP_PAGIZII_MAL ;

LEXICON PropNameMaleDer-Y-0Evich
+Orth/Colloq:ič PROP_OŠ_PATRMAL ;
:jevič PROP_OŠ_PATRMAL ;
:jevna PROP_KUDO_PATRFEM ;
:ʼ PROP_ABRAMOV_MAL ;

!! Vili:Vil
LEXICON PropNameMaleDer-I-YEvich
+Orth/Colloq:ič PROP_OŠ_PATRMAL ;
:ʼjevič PROP_OŠ_PATRMAL ;
:ʼjevna PROP_KUDO_PATRFEM ;
:i PROP_KAL_MAL ;


LEXICON PropNameMaleDer-Ovich
+Orth/Colloq:šč PROP_OŠ_PATRMAL ;
:ovič PROP_OŠ_PATRMAL ;
:ovna PROP_KUDO_PATRFEM ;
 PROP_KAL_MAL ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! Russian type Surnames 
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! Abdʼejev:Abdʼejev
LEXICON Deriv-RUS-V_SURMAL
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sem/Mal: NMN_ABRAMOV ;
:a PROP_KUDO_SURFEM ;

!! Bagrij:Bagr
LEXICON Deriv-RUS-IJ_SURMAL
:ii PROP_PAGIZII_MAL ;
:jaja PROP_KUDO_SURFEM ;

!! Amorskij:Amorsk
LEXICON Deriv-RUS-KIJ_SURMAL
:ii PROP_PAGIZII_MAL ;
:aja PROP_KUDO_SURFEM ;

LEXICON Deriv-RUS-OJ_SURMAL
:oj PROP_KAL_SURMAL ;
:aja PROP_KUDO_SURFEM ;

LEXICON Deriv-RUS-HIJ_SURMAL
:šʼ PROP_KAL_SURMAL ;
:aja PROP_KUDO_SURFEM ;

LEXICON Deriv-RUS-AN_SURMAL
 Deriv-RUS-V_SURMAL ;

LEXICON Deriv-RUS-IN_SURMAL
 Deriv-RUS-V_SURMAL ;


LEXICON PROP_KAL_SURMAL
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sem/Mal: # ;

LEXICON PROP_KUDO_SURFEM
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sem/Fem: NMN_KALA ;

LEXICON PROP_OSTAI_FEM
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%>%{ijPRC%} NMN_OSTAI ;
LEXICON PROP_OSTAI_MAL
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%>%{ijPRC%} NMN_OSTAI ;

LEXICON CYRL-CONS_SUR
 PROP_KAL_SUR ;

LEXICON PROP_KAL_SUR
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: # ;



LEXICON CYRL-T_SUR
 PROP_KIT_SUR ;

LEXICON PROP_KIT_SUR
 PROP_KAL_SUR ;

LEXICON CYRL-K_SUR
 PROP_LAK_SUR ;

LEXICON PROP_LAK_SUR
 PROP_KAL_SUR ;

LEXICON CYRL-SIBILANT_SUR
 PROP_OŠ_SUR ;

LEXICON PROP_OŠ_SUR
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: NMN_ABRAMOV ;

LEXICON CYRL-VOW_SUR
 PROP_KUDO_SUR ;

LEXICON CYRL-A_SUR
 PROP_KUDO_SUR ;

LEXICON PROP_KUDO_SUR
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: NMN_KALA ;

LEXICON PROP_PAGIZII_MAL
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: NMN_PAGIZII ;

LEXICON PROP_PAGIZII_SURMAL
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sem/Mal: NMN_PAGIZII ;



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! PLACE NAMES FROM TEMPLATES !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON PROP-PLC_KAL
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: NMN_ABRAMOV ;

LEXICON PROP-PLC_KIT
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: NMN_ABRAMOV ;

LEXICON PROP-PLC_OŠ
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: NMN_ABRAMOV ;

LEXICON PROP-PLC_KUDO
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: NMN_KALA ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! Erzya settlements !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON PROP-SETTLEMENT_KAL
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: NMN_ABRAMOV ;

LEXICON PROP-SETTLEMENT_KIT
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: NMN_ABRAMOV ;

LEXICON PROP-SETTLEMENT_OŠ
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: NMN_ABRAMOV ;

LEXICON PROP-SETTLEMENT_PANGO
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: NMN_RUNO ;

LEXICON PROP-SETTLEMENT_KUDO
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: NMN_KALA ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! Divinities !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON PROP_KAL_DIVINITY
+N+Prop+Sem/Hum+Sem/Divinity: NMN_ABRAMOV ;

LEXICON PROP_OŠ_DIVINITY
+N+Prop+Sem/Hum+Sem/Divinity: NMN_ABRAMOV ;

LEXICON PROP_PANGO_DIVINITY
+N+Prop+Sem/Hum+Sem/Divinity: NMN_RUNO ;

LEXICON PROP_KUDO_DIVINITY
+N+Prop+Sem/Hum+Sem/Divinity: NMN_KALA ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! Constellations !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON PROP_KAL_CONSTELLATION
+N+Prop+Sem/Constellation+Sem/Plc: NMN_ABRAMOV ;

LEXICON PROP_OŠ_CONSTELLATION
+N+Prop+Sem/Constellation+Sem/Plc: NMN_ABRAMOV  ;

LEXICON PROP_OŠ-PL_CONSTELLATION
+N+Prop+Sem/Constellation+Sem/Plc+Pl: NMN_ABRAMOV-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_PANGO_CONSTELLATION
+N+Prop+Sem/Constellation+Sem/Plc: NMN_RUNO ;

LEXICON PROP_KUDO_CONSTELLATION
+N+Prop+Sem/Constellation+Sem/Plc: NMN_KALA ;

LEXICON PROP_KUDO-PL_CONSTELLATION
+N+Prop+Sem/Constellation+Sem/Plc+Pl: NMN_KALA-PL ; 

LEXICON PROP_TJeŠTJe_CONSTELLATION
+N+Prop+Sem/Constellation+Sem/Plc: NMN_RUNO ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! TEXT NAMES !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON PROP_KAL_TXT
+N+Prop+Sem/Txt: NMN_ABRAMOV ;

LEXICON PROP_OŠ_TXT
+N+Prop+Sem/Txt: NMN_ABRAMOV  ;

LEXICON PROP_KUDO_TXT
+N+Prop+Sem/Txt: NMN_KALA ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! HOLIDAYS !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON PROP_KAL_HOLIDAY
+N+Prop+Event: NMN_ABRAMOV ;

LEXICON PROP_OŠ_HOLIDAY
+N+Prop+Event: NMN_ABRAMOV  ;

LEXICON PROP_KUDO_HOLIDAY
+N+Prop+Event: NMN_KALA ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! RIVER NAMES !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON PROP_KAL_RIVERS
+N+Prop+Rvr: NMN_ABRAMOV ;

LEXICON PROP_OŠ_RIVERS
+N+Prop+Rvr: NMN_ABRAMOV  ;

LEXICON PROP_KUDO_RIVERS
+N+Prop+Rvr: NMN_KALA ;


!!
LEXICON PROP_KAL
+N+Prop: NMN_ABRAMOV ;

LEXICON PROP_LAK
+N+Prop: NMN_ABRAMOV ;

LEXICON PROP_KIT
+N+Prop: NMN_ABRAMOV ;

LEXICON PROP_OŠ
+N+Prop: NMN_ABRAMOV ;

LEXICON PROP_TJeŠTJe
 N_RUNO ;

LEXICON PROP_TINGJe
 N_RUNO ;

LEXICON PROP_PANGO
+N+Prop: NMN_RUNO ;

LEXICON PROP_KUDO
+N+Prop: NMN_KALA ;



LEXICON PROP_KAL_MAL
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: NMN_ABRAMOV ;
LEXICON PROP_ABRAMOV_MAL
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: NMN_ABRAMOV ;
LEXICON PROP_ABRAMOV_FEM
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: NMN_ABRAMOV ;

LEXICON PROP_LAK_MAL
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: NMN_ABRAMOV ;

LEXICON PROP_KIT_MAL
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: NMN_ABRAMOV ;

LEXICON PROP_OŠ_MAL
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: NMN_ABRAMOV  ;

LEXICON PROP_TJeŠTJe_MAL
 PROP_PANGO_MAL ;

LEXICON PROP_TINGJe_MAL
 PROP_PANGO_MAL ;

LEXICON PROP_PANGO_MAL
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: NMN_RUNO ;

LEXICON PROP_KUDO_MAL
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: NMN_KALA ;

LEXICON PROP_KAL_FEM
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: NMN_ABRAMOV ;

LEXICON PROP_LAK_FEM
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: NMN_ABRAMOV ;

LEXICON PROP_KIT_FEM
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: NMN_ABRAMOV ;

LEXICON PROP_OŠ_FEM
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: NMN_ABRAMOV  ;

LEXICON PROP_TJeŠTJe_FEM
 PROP_PANGO_FEM ;

LEXICON PROP_TINGJe_FEM
 PROP_PANGO_FEM ;

LEXICON PROP_PANGO_FEM
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: NMN_RUNO ;

LEXICON PROP_KUDO_FEM
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: NMN_KALA ;


LEXICON PROP_OŠ_PATRMAL
+N+Prop+Sem/Patr+Sem/Mal: NMN_ABRAMOV ;

LEXICON PROP_KUDO_PATRFEM
+N+Prop+Sem/Patr+Sem/Fem: NMN_KALA ;

!! DECLENSION LIMITATIONS

LEXICON PROP_KUDO-PL
+N+Prop+Pl: NMN_KALA-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_KUDO_SUB
+Err/Sub: PROP_KUDO ;

LEXICON PROP_KUDO_SH
+Use/Short: PROP_KUDO ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
