src/morphology/stems/rus-Cyrl-2-Lat-propernouns.lexc
LEXICON rus-Cyrl-2-Lat-ProperNouns
Basarab:Basarab CYRL-CONS_SUR "Z" ;
Bʼerlic:Bʼerlic CYRL-SIBILANT_SUR "Z" ;
Bʼerlʼant:Bʼerlʼant CYRL-T_SUR "Z" ;
Bʼesprozvannšʼ:Bʼesprozvann Deriv-RUS-HIJ_SURMAL "Z" ;
Božʼenik:Božʼenik CYRL-K_SUR "Z" ;
Borovʼenskij:Borovʼensk Deriv-RUS-KIJ_SURMAL "Z" ;
Borsukov:Borsukov Deriv-RUS-V_SURMAL "Z" ;
Bosšh:Bosšh CYRL-CONS_SUR "Z" ;
Brožko:Brožko CYRL-VOW_SUR "Z" ;
Bruhtij:Bruht Deriv-RUS-IJ_SURMAL "Z" ;
Burkot:Burkot CYRL-T_SUR "Z" ;
Vajcʼehovič:Vajcʼehovič CYRL-SIBILANT_SUR "Z" ;
Vatin:Vatin Deriv-RUS-IN_SURMAL "Z" ;
Volčʼek:Volčʼek CYRL-K_SUR "Z" ;
Voskovskij:Voskovsk Deriv-RUS-KIJ_SURMAL "Z" ;
Gajevoj:Gajev Deriv-RUS-OJ_SURMAL "Z" ;
Gaman:Gaman Deriv-RUS-AN_SURMAL "Z" ;
Gʼejst:Gʼejst CYRL-T_SUR "Z" ;
Gʼeorgica:Gʼeorgica CYRL-A_SUR "Z" ;
Giršbʼerg:Giršbʼerg CYRL-CONS_SUR "Z" ;
Govzan:Govzan Deriv-RUS-AN_SURMAL "Z" ;
Govorko:Govorko CYRL-VOW_SUR "Z" ;
Golivʼec:Golivʼec CYRL-SIBILANT_SUR "Z" ;
Gorničnšʼ:Gorničn Deriv-RUS-HIJ_SURMAL "Z" ;
Grot:Grot CYRL-T_SUR "Z" ;
Grudovšʼ:Grudov Deriv-RUS-IJ_SURMAL "Z" ;
Gulʼtajčuk:Gulʼtajčuk CYRL-K_SUR "Z" ;
Gusan:Gusan Deriv-RUS-AN_SURMAL "Z" ;
Davlʼetkilʼdʼejev:Davlʼetkilʼdʼejev Deriv-RUS-V_SURMAL "Z" ;
Dʼeploranskij:Dʼeploransk Deriv-RUS-KIJ_SURMAL "Z" ;
Dšhnič:Dšhnič CYRL-SIBILANT_SUR "Z" ;
Dščʼenko:Dščʼenko CYRL-VOW_SUR "Z" ;
Dššlʼevoj:Dššlʼev Deriv-RUS-OJ_SURMAL "Z" ;
Jepišin:Jepišin Deriv-RUS-IN_SURMAL "Z" ;
Jerʼebakan:Jerʼebakan Deriv-RUS-AN_SURMAL "Z" ;
Žarik:Žarik CYRL-K_SUR "Z" ;
Žulʼej:Žulʼej CYRL-CONS_SUR "Z" ;
Zavorotnšʼ:Zavorotn Deriv-RUS-HIJ_SURMAL "Z" ;
Zatinackij:Zatinack Deriv-RUS-KIJ_SURMAL "Z" ;
Zajarnšʼ:Zajarn Deriv-RUS-HIJ_SURMAL "Z" ;
Zʼuba:Zʼuba CYRL-A_SUR "Z" ;
Karšʼ:Kar Deriv-RUS-IJ_SURMAL "Z" ;
Kasatonov:Kasatonov Deriv-RUS-V_SURMAL "Z" ;
Kulʼupin:Kulʼupin Deriv-RUS-IN_SURMAL "Z" ;
Kucʼenko:Kucʼenko CYRL-VOW_SUR "Z" ;
Lanovoj:Lanov Deriv-RUS-OJ_SURMAL "Z" ;
Mogila:Mogila CYRL-A_SUR "Z" ;
Mordovcʼev:Mordovcʼev Deriv-RUS-V_SURMAL "Z" ;
Pʼenʼkovšʼ:Pʼenʼkov Deriv-RUS-IJ_SURMAL "Z" ;
Pʼetšgin:Pʼetšgin Deriv-RUS-IN_SURMAL "Z" ;
Pʼecʼevič:Pʼecʼevič CYRL-SIBILANT_SUR "Z" ;
Polʼevoj:Polʼev Deriv-RUS-OJ_SURMAL "Z" ;
Popovskij:Popovsk Deriv-RUS-KIJ_SURMAL "Z" ;
Sagajdačnšʼ:Sagajdačn Deriv-RUS-HIJ_SURMAL "Z" ;
Sarana:Sarana CYRL-A_SUR "Z" ;
Storožʼenko:Storožʼenko CYRL-VOW_SUR "Z" ;
Taraban:Taraban Deriv-RUS-AN_SURMAL "Z" ;
Troickoj:Troick Deriv-RUS-OJ_SURMAL "Z" ;
Finogʼenov:Finogʼenov Deriv-RUS-V_SURMAL "Z" ;
Fisun:Fisun CYRL-CONS_SUR "Z" ;
Čʼenčik:Čʼenčik CYRL-K_SUR "Z" ;
Šʼeglovitšʼ:Šʼeglovit Deriv-RUS-IJ_SURMAL "Z" ;
Ejsmont:Ejsmont CYRL-T_SUR "Z" ;
Juffa:Juffa CYRL-A_SUR "Z" ;
Jakin:Jakin Deriv-RUS-IN_SURMAL "Z" ;
Asa:Asa PROP_KUDO_MAL "Z" ;
Afinogʼen:Afinogʼen PropNameMaleDer-Ovich  "Z" ;
Ahaz:Ahaz PROP_OŠ_MAL "Z" ;
Boaz:Boaz PROP_OŠ_MAL "Z" ;
Gʼeralʼd:Gʼeralʼd PropNameMaleDer-Ovich  "Z" ;
Ijessʼej:Ijessʼe PROP_OSTAI_MAL "Z" ;
Iisus:Iisus PROP_OŠ_MAL "Z" ;
Ilʼham:Ilʼham PropNameMaleDer-Ovich  "Z" ;
Ioram:Ioram PROP_ABRAMOV_MAL "Z" ;
Iosafat:Iosafat PROP_KIT_MAL "Z" ;
Isajja:Isajja PROP_KUDO_MAL "Z" ;
Iskariot:Iskariot PROP_KIT_SUR "Z" ;
Lʼebbʼej:Lʼebbʼe PROP_OSTAI_MAL "Z" ;
Manassʼe:Manassʼe PROP_KUDO_MAL "Z" ;
Mansur:Mansur PropNameMaleDer-Ovich  "Z" ;
Mihail:Mihajlovič PROP_OŠ_PATRMAL "Z" ;
Mihail:Mihajlovna PROP_KUDO_PATRFEM "Z" ;
Nahšon:Nahšon PROP_ABRAMOV_MAL "Z" ;
Pavol:Pavlovič PROP_OŠ_PATRMAL  "Z" ;
Pavol:Pavlovna PROP_KUDO_PATRFEM  "Z" ;
Pʼerʼes:Pʼerʼes PROP_OŠ_MAL "Z" ;
Pʼotr:Pʼetrovič PROP_OŠ_PATRMAL  "Z" ;
Pʼotr:Pʼetrovna PROP_KUDO_PATRFEM  "Z" ;
Rʼehavʼeam:Rʼehavʼeam PROP_ABRAMOV_MAL "Z" ;
Sadok:Sadok PROP_LAK_MAL "Z" ;
Soslan:Soslan PropNameMaleDer-Ovich  "Z" ;
Taddʼej:Taddʼe PROP_OSTAI_MAL "Z" ;
Urija:Urija PROP_KUDO_MAL "Z" ;
Hristos:Hristos PROP_OŠ_SUR "Z" ;
Elʼeazar:Elʼeazar PROP_ABRAMOV_MAL "Z" ;
Andrʼej:Andrʼe PropNameMaleDer-J-0Evich  "Z" ;
Arkʼelaj:Arkʼela PROP_OSTAI_MAL "Z" ;
Arsʼenij:Arsʼen PropNameMaleDer-IJ-I0Evich  "Z" ;
Vasilij:Vasil PropNameMaleDer-IJ-Y0Evich  "Z" ;
Galij:Gal PropNameMaleDer-IJ-I0Evich  "Z" ;
Gʼeorgij:Gʼeorgi PropNameMaleDer-J-0Evich  "Z" ;
Grigorij:Grigor PropNameMaleDer-IJ-Y0Evich  "Z" ;
Dmitrij:Dmitr PropNameMaleDer-IJ-I0Evich  "Z" ;
Jevlogij:Jevlogi PropNameMaleDer-J-0Evich  "Z" ;
Jevsʼevʼjevič:Jevsʼevʼjevič PROP_OŠ_PATRMAL "Z" ;
Jekonija:Jekonija PROP_KUDO_MAL "Z" ;
Jerʼemʼej:Jerʼemʼe PropNameMaleDer-J-0Evich  "Z" ;
Zorovavʼelʼ:Zorovavʼelʼ PROP_KAL_MAL "Z" ;
Ignatij:Ignat PropNameMaleDer-IJ-Y0Evich  "Z" ;
Klimʼentij:Klimʼent PropNameMaleDer-IJ-I0Evich  "Z" ;
Lʼevkij:Lʼevki PropNameMaleDer-J-0Evich  "Z" ;
Prokopij:Prokop PropNameMaleDer-IJ-Y0Evich  "Z" ;
Prokofij:Prokof PropNameMaleDer-IJ-Y0Evich  "Z" ;
Sʼergʼej:Sʼergʼe PropNameMaleDer-J-0Evich  "Z" ;
Fotij:Fot PropNameMaleDer-IJ-I0Evich  "Z" ;
Francʼ:Franc PropNameMaleDer-Y-0Evich  "Z" ;
Gabrijeli:Gabrijel PropNameMaleDer-I-YEvich  "Z" ;
Igori:Igor PropNameMaleDer-I-YEvich  "Z" ;
Lazari:Lazar PropNameMaleDer-I-YEvich  "Z" ;
Naili:Nail PropNameMaleDer-I-YEvich  "Z" ;
Juri:Jur PropNameMaleDer-I-YEvich  "Z" ;
Antoška:Antoška PROP_KUDO_FEM "Z" ;
Anuš:Anuš PROP_OŠ_FEM "Z" ;
Vlasta:Vlasta PROP_KUDO_FEM "Z" ;
Gʼertrud:Gʼertrud PROP_ABRAMOV_FEM "Z" ;
Zʼevʼedʼej:Zʼevʼedʼe PROP_OSTAI_MAL "Z" ;
Zʼerah:Zʼerah PROP_ABRAMOV_MAL "Z" ;
Katʼuša:Katʼuša PROP_KUDO_FEM "Z" ;
Loris:Loris PROP_OŠ_FEM "Z" ;
Lʼubovʼ:Lʼubovʼ PROP_ABRAMOV_FEM "Z" ;
Marʼjam:Marʼjam PROP_ABRAMOV_FEM "Z" ;
Natalʼa:Natalʼa PROP_KUDO_FEM "Z" ;
Olʼesʼ:Olʼesʼ PROP_OŠ_FEM "Z" ;
Olʼdaj:Olʼda PROP_OSTAI_FEM "Z" ;
Rahilʼ:Rahilʼ PROP_ABRAMOV_FEM "Z" ;
Rut:Rut PROP_KIT_FEM "Z" ;
Erna:Erna PROP_KUDO_FEM "Z" ;
Estʼer:Estʼer PROP_ABRAMOV_FEM "Z" ;
Janis:Janis PROP_OŠ_FEM "Z" ;
